hw2/foma/el.foma
### el.foma (Modern Greek) ###
### Adriana R. Flórez      ###
## -------------------------##

## Vowels, consonants and syllables
define V [α | ε | η | ι | ο | υ | ω | ά | έ | ή | ί | ό | ύ | ώ ] ;
define C [β | γ | δ | ζ | θ | κ | λ | μ | ν | ξ | π | ρ | σ | τ | φ | χ | ψ];
define S [C (C) V (V) (V) (V)];

## Lexicon
read lexc el.lexc
define Lexicon;

## Nouns and adjectives
## Base form: always masc, singular, nominative
## --------------------
define DeleteSufO ο -> 0 || _ "^" ; # Nouns
define DeleteSufMa μ α -> 0 || _ "^" ;
define DeleteSufA α -> 0 || _ "^" ;
define DeleteSufI η -> 0 || _ "^" ;
define DeleteSufI2 ι -> 0 || _ "^" ;
define DeleteSufOs ο ς -> 0 || _ "^" ; # Adjs
define DeleteSufOsTonos ό ς -> 0 || _ "^" ;
define DeleteSufAs α ς -> 0 || _ "^" ;
define DeleteSufIs ή ς -> 0 || _ "^" ;
define DeleteSufUs ύ ς -> 0 || _ "^" ;

## Phonological rules
# Passive verbs
define PhonoXPassive θ -> τ || χ "^" _;
define PhonoZPassive ζ -> 0 || _ "^" σ ;
define PhonoGPassive γ -> χ || _ "^" θ ;
# Active verbs
define PhonoVActive  ν -> σ ||  _ "^" "^" ;
define PhonoZActive [ζ | τ | δ | θ | σ] -> σ || _ "^" "^" ;
define PhonoPsActive [π | β | φ | π τ | φ τ | α υ | ε υ] -> ψ || _ "^" "^" ;
define PhonoKActive [κ | γ | χ | χ ν] -> ξ || _ "^" "^" ;
define PhonoSActive [σ σ | ξ σ] -> ξ || _ "^" "^" ;
define CleanS σ -> 0 || [σ | ψ | ξ] _ "^" "^" ;

# Aorist increment
# define AoristEpsilon [..] -> έ || .#. _ ?* "!" ?* (check it is only 2 syllables?); 

# Clean up
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

## Combine grammar
define Grammar Lexicon .o. 
DeleteSufO .o. DeleteSufMa .o. DeleteSufA .o. DeleteSufI .o. DeleteSufI2 .o.
DeleteSufOs .o. DeleteSufOsTonos .o. 
DeleteSufAs .o.
DeleteSufIs .o.
DeleteSufUs .o.
PhonoXPassive .o. PhonoGPassive .o. PhonoZPassive .o.
PhonoVActive .o. PhonoZActive .o. PhonoPsActive .o.PhonoKActive .o. PhonoSActive .o. 
Cleanup;

regex Grammar;
